New York, session 2025-2026, A457.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (e) of subdivision 3 of section 265.01-e of the 2 penal law, as amended by section 1 of part F of chapter 55 of the laws 3 of 2023, is amended and a new paragraph (e-1) is added to read as 4 follows: 5 (e) security guards as defined by and registered under article seven-A 6 of the general business law, who are licensed to carry a firearm while 7 traveling to and from work, who have been granted a special armed regis- 8 tration card, while at the location of their employment and during their 9 work hours as such a security guard; 10 (e-1) private investigators licensed under article seven of the gener- 11 al business law, who are licensed to carry a firearm while traveling to 12 and from and during the course of their employment and at any necessary 13 and appropriate location during their work hours as such a private 14 investigator; 15 § 2. Paragraph (d) of subdivision 2 of section 265.01-d of the penal 16 law, as amended by section 2 of part F of chapter 55 of the laws of 17 2023, is amended and a new paragraph (d-1) is added to read as follows: 18 (d) security guards as defined by and registered under article seven-A 19 of the general business law, who are licensed to carry a firearm while 20 traveling to and from work, who [has] have been granted a special armed 21 registration card, while at the location of their employment and during 22 their work hours as such a security guard; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01117-01-5 A. 457 2 1 (d-1) private investigators licensed under article seven of the gener- 2 al business law, who are licensed to carry a firearm while traveling to 3 and from and during the course of their employment and at any necessary 4 and appropriate location during their work hours as such a private 5 investigator; 6 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.